Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1928.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 82 O.S. 2021, Section 1020.15, is
amended to read as follows:

SB1928 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Section 1020.15. A. The Oklahoma Water Resources Board shall
not permit any groundwater user to commit waste by:
1. Drilling a well, taking, or using groundwater without a
permit, except for domestic use;
2. Taking more groundwater than is authorized by the permit;
3. Taking or using groundwater in any manner so that the water
is lost for beneficial use;
4. Transporting groundwater from a well to the place of use in
such a manner that there is an excessive loss in transit;
5. Using groundwater in such an inefficient manner that
excessive losses occur;
6. Allowing any groundwater to reach a pervious stratum and be
lost into cavernous or otherwise pervious materials encountered in a
well;
7. Permitting or causing the pollution of a fresh water strata
or basin through any act which will permit fresh groundwater
polluted by minerals or other waste to filter or otherwise intrude
into such a basin or subbasin. The Board shall be precluded from
determining whether waste by pollution will occur pursuant to the
provisions of this paragraph if the activity for which the applicant
or water user intends to or has used the water as specified under
Section 1020.9 of this title is required to comply with rules and
requirements of or is within the jurisdictional areas of
environmental responsibility of the Department of Environmental
SB1928 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Qual ity or the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and
Forestry;
8. Drilling wells and producing groundwater therefrom except in
accordance with the well spacing previously determined by the Board;
9. Using groundwater for air conditioning or cooling purposes
without providing facilities to aerate and reuse such water; or
10. Failure to properly plug abandoned water wells in
accordance with rules of the Board and file reports thereof; or
11. Using groundwater for cooling purposes at a data processing
facility or data center through open-air evaporative cooling systems
or any other cooling technology that consumes groundwater through
evaporation or discharge without recirculation. Groundwater permits
for such facilities shall only be issued if the applicant
demonstrates that the cooling system utilizes closed-loop,
dielectric immersion, or other comparably low-consumptive cooling
technologies that substantially recirculate groundwater and minimize
consumptive loss as determined by the Board.
B. Except as otherwise provided by paragraph 7 of subsection A
of this section, any employee of the Board having evidence that an
act of waste is being committed in his or her presence, or after
investigation of a complaint filed by another individual, shall take
steps to assure that the waste ceases. Such steps shall include but
shall not be limited to pursuing voluntary compliance, obtaining the
issuance of a cease and desist order by the Executive Director,
SB1928 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

inst ituting action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin
the waste, pursuing a suspension of any permit or other
administrative remedies by the Board, and filing a complaint in the
district court of the county wherein such violation has occurred,
and it shall be the duty of the district attorney of said county to
prosecute such complaint.
C. In cases of waste by pollution pursuant to paragraph 7 of
subsection A of this section, any complaint or investigation, or any
enforcement matter other than an individual proceeding involving the
suspension of an Oklahoma Water Resources Board permit shall be
referred to and subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of
Environmental Quality or other appropriate state environmental
agency or state agency with limited environmental responsibility.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 82 O.S. 2021, Section 1020.19, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1020.19. Upon request of a majority of the landowners
residing within a basin or subbasin, the Board is authorized to
require that water wells be metered and that such meters as the
Board shall approve be utilized by the applicant and placed under
seal, subject to reading by the agents of the Board at any time.
The Board may also require that the applicant report the reading of
such meters at reasonable intervals.
A. To encourage groundwater conservation, beginning January 1,
2027, the Oklahoma Water Resources Board shall provide a five-year
SB1928 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

flex allocation of groundwater usage based off the previously
determined allocated annual use of the basin or subbasin. A five-
year flex allocation shall not require a new permit for existing
permit holders. A five-year flex allocation shall be available for:
1. Existing permit holders for groundwater use permits in
basins or subbasins, based upon the maximum annual yield
determination at the time of the original application;
2. New applicants for groundwater use permits in basins or
subbasins based upon the current maximum annual yield determination;
and
3. New and existing applicants and temporary permit holders for
groundwater use permits in basins or subbasins where the maximum
annual yield has yet to be determined.
B. An applicant for a five-year flex allocation shall be
required to:
1. Submit an annual usage report of the prior year’s usage from
a Board-approved water measurement system; and
2. Pay the annual groundwater permit fee.
C. A five-year flex allocation shall allow the permit holder to
exceed the determined annual allocation in any year of the five-year
allocation; provided, that the applicant shall adhere to the
cumulative annually determined allocation of the basin or subbasin
over the five-year period. The permit holder shall not exceed the

SB1928 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

perm itted annual allocation by over one hundred fifty percent (150%)
in any of the five (5) years.
D. 1. For all permit holders not participating in the five-
year flex allocation pursuant to this section, a groundwater
irrigation district created pursuant to the Groundwater Irrigation
District Act or a conservation district participating in a
conservation cost-share program pursuant to Section 3-3-101 et seq.
of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes shall develop a voluntary
groundwater use measurement program that provides Board-approved
measuring systems to members, on a loan or cost-share basis, for use
in verifying the volume of water pumped from wells and irrigation
systems to ensure system efficiency and proper accounting of water
use.
2. The groundwater irrigation district or conservation district
shall issue an annual certification that the permit holder has
participated in the groundwater use measurement program pursuant to
paragraph 1 of this subsection. The certification shall be
submitted with the permit holder’s annual water use report.
E. Nothing in this section shall apply to domestic wells.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND NATURAL RESOURCES
OVERSIGHT, dated 04/14/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended.


SB1928 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.